Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-361.01
Neglect, defined.

Neglect
means any knowing or intentional act or omission on the part of a caregiver
to provide essential services or the failure of a vulnerable adult, due to
physical or mental impairments, to perform self-care or obtain essential
services to
such an extent that there is actual physical injury to a vulnerable adult
or imminent danger of the vulnerable adult suffering physical injury or death.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 28-355;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 7.